Wisconsin, session 2025, SB875.
do enact as follows:SB875,13Section 1. 84.02 (5) (d) 2. r. of the statutes is created to read:SB875,1,5484.02 (5) (d) 2. r. The Platteville Veteran’s Memorial in the city of Platteville 5in Grant County.SB875,21Section 2. Initial applicability.SB875,2,32(1) This act first applies to highway maps published after the effective date of 3this subsection.SB875,2,44